Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-1007.10
Cost growth
factor; computation.

(1) For state aid calculated
for all school fiscal years except school fiscal year 2010-11, the cost growth factor shall equal
the sum of: (a) The basic
allowable growth rate pursuant to section 79-1025 for the school fiscal year
in which the aid is to be distributed; plus (b) the basic allowable growth
rate pursuant to section 79-1025 for the school fiscal year immediately preceding
the school fiscal year in which the aid is to be distributed.

(2) For state aid calculated
for school fiscal year 2010-11, the cost growth factor shall equal the sum
of: (i) One; plus (ii) the basic allowable growth rate pursuant to section
79-1025 for the school fiscal year in which the aid is to be distributed;
plus (iii) the basic allowable growth rate pursuant to section 79-1025 for
the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which
the aid is to be distributed; plus (iv) two percent.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 83;

Laws 2007, LB21, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 32;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 8.
April 27, 2011